District of Columbia statutes.
50-2633.01

Parking meter fee moratorium; exceptions.

(a)

The Director of the District Department of Transportation (“Director”) shall exempt particular neighborhoods from Saturday meter enforcement where the Director determines that Saturday meter enforcement would not be in the public interest. In making such a determination, the Director shall consider whether Saturday meter enforcement is necessary to maintain available curbside parking; provided, that by October 15, 2009, the Director shall submit to the Council for approval, by resolution, the neighborhoods to be exempted from Saturday enforcement and the criteria used to exempt each neighborhood. Nothing in this subsection may be implemented until the Council affirmatively approves the submission of the Director.

(b)

No person shall park at a parking meter on a Saturday between 7:00 a.m. and 6:30 p.m. for more than 2 hours, unless current signage permits parking for a longer time. Failure to move the vehicle after 2 hours on a Saturday, between 7:00 a.m. and 6:30 p.m., shall constitute a violation unless current signage permits parking for a longer time.

(c)

The Mayor may promulgate rules to exempt certain streets from the provisions of this subchapter when necessary to accommodate special needs or situations identified by proximate businesses or District agencies, subject to approval by the Council.

Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-273, § 2, 52 DCR 825
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 6022, 57 DCR 181

History

D.C. Law 18-111 rewrote subsec. (a), which had read as follows: “(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no citation shall be issued for a parking meter fee violation at any time on a Saturday, or on other days between the hours of 6:30 p.m. and 7:00 a.m.”

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Parking Meter Fee Moratorium Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-68, February 27, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2278).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Parking Meter Fee Moratorium Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-245, March 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2758).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Parking Meter Fee Moratorium Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-94, March 10, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3614).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Parking Meter Fee Moratorium Temporary Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-247, March 17, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4123).

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (90 day) addition of § 50-2661, see § 2 of Parking Meter Fee Moratorium Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-149, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 10197).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 50-2661, see § 2 of Parking Meter Fee Moratorium Congressional Review Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-262, January 30, 2002, 49 DCR 1440).
For temporary (90 day) parking meter fee moratorium, see § 2 of Parking Meter Fee Moratorium Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-496, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 9786).
For temporary (90 day) parking meter fee moratorium, see § 2 of Parking Meter Fee Moratorium Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-12, January 27, 2003, 50 DCR 1485).
For temporary (90 day) parking meter fee moratorium, see § 2 of Parking Meter Fee Moratorium Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-226, November 25, 2003, 50 DCR 10709).
For temporary (90 day) parking meter fee moratorium, see § 2 of Parking Meter Fee Moratorium Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-345, January 29, 2004, 51 DCR 1831).
For temporary (90 day) parking meter fee moratorium, see § 2 of Parking Meter Fee Moratorium Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-587, November 1, 2004, 51 DCR 10712).
For temporary (90 day) parking meter fee moratorium, see § 2 of Parking Meter Fee Moratorium Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-15, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2956).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6022 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 6022 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Emergency Legislation

Short title: Section 6020 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle C of title VI of the act may be cited as the “Equitable Parking Meter Rates Amendment Act of 2009”.

Short Title